South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3074.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 20-3-130(B)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) Periodic alimony to be paid but terminating on the remarriage or continued cohabitation of the supported spouse or upon the death of either spouse (except as secured in subsection (D)) and terminable and modifiable based upon changed circumstances occurring in the future; provided, however, periodic alimony is only available for a marriage lasting at least fifteen years. The purpose of this form of support may include, but is not limited to, circumstances where the court finds it appropriate to order the payment of alimony on an ongoing basis where it is desirable to make a current determination and requirement for the ongoing support of a spouse to be reviewed and revised as circumstances may dictate in the future. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----